Idaho, session 2026, H0744.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 48, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 21, Title 48, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 21
CAPTURE OR USE OF BIOMETRIC IDENTIFIERS
48-2101. CAPTURE OR USE OF BIOMETRIC IDENTIFIERS. (1) As used in this
section:
(a) "Artificial intelligence" means any machine-based system that, for
any explicit or implicit objective, infers from the inputs the system
receives how to generate outputs, including content, decisions, pre-
dictions, or recommendations, that can influence physical or virtual
environments.
(b) "Biometric identifier" means a retina or iris scan, fingerprint,
voiceprint, or record of hand or face geometry.
(2)(a) A person may not capture a biometric identifier of an individual
for a commercial purpose unless the person:
(i) Informs the individual before capturing the biometric iden-
tifier; and
(ii) Receives the individual's consent to capture the biometric
identifier.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, an individual has not been in-
formed of and has not provided consent for the capture or storage of a
biometric identifier for a commercial purpose based solely on the ex-
istence of an image or other media containing one (1) or more biometric
identifiers of the individual on the internet or other publicly avail-
able source unless the image or other media was made publicly available
by the individual to whom the biometric identifiers relate.
(3) Persons or entities possessing a biometric identifier of an indi-
vidual that is captured for a commercial purpose:
(a) May not sell, lease, or otherwise disclose the biometric identifier
to another person unless:
(i) The individual consents to the disclosure for identification
purposes in the event of the individual's disappearance or death;
(ii) The disclosure completes a financial transaction that the
individual requested or authorized;


(iii) The disclosure is required or permitted by state or federal
law; or
(iv) The disclosure is made by or to a law enforcement agency for a
law enforcement purpose in response to a warrant;
(b) Shall store, transmit, and protect from disclosure the biometric
identifier using reasonable care and in a manner that is the same as or
more protective than the manner in which the person stores, transmits,
and protects any other confidential information the person possesses;
(c) Shall destroy the biometric identifier within a reasonable time,
but no later than the first anniversary of the date the purpose for col-
lecting the identifier expires, except as provided by subsection (4) of
this section; and
(d) Shall provide a method for an individual to revoke consent to the
storage and transmission of a biometric identifier at any time and shall
immediately destroy the biometric identifier upon receiving a revoca-
tion of consent unless maintaining the biometric identifier is required
by another law.
(4) If a biometric identifier captured for a commercial purpose is used
in connection with an instrument or document that is required by another law
to be maintained for a period longer than the period prescribed by subsec-
tion (3)(c) of this section, the person who possesses the biometric identi-
fier shall destroy the biometric identifier within a reasonable time, but no
later than the first anniversary of the date the instrument or document is no
longer required to be maintained by law.
(5) If a biometric identifier captured for a commercial purpose has
been collected for security purposes by an employer, the purpose for col-
lecting the identifier pursuant to subsection (3)(c) of this section is
presumed to expire on termination of the employment relationship.
(6) A person who violates the provisions of this section is subject to
a civil penalty of not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for
each violation. The attorney general may bring an action to recover civil
penalties pursuant to this subsection.
(7) The provisions of this section do not apply to:
(a) Voiceprint data retained by a financial institution or an affili-
ate of a financial institution, as those terms are defined by 15 U.S.C.
6809;
(b) The processing or storage of biometric identifiers involved in
the developing, training, evaluating, disseminating, or otherwise of-
fering of artificial intelligence models or systems, unless a system
is used or deployed for the purpose of uniquely identifying a specific
individual; or
(c) The development or deployment of an artificial intelligence model
or system for the purposes of:
(i) Preventing, detecting, protecting against, or responding to
security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious
or deceptive activities, or any other illegal activity;
(ii) Preserving the integrity or security of a system; or
(iii) Investigating, reporting, or prosecuting a person responsi-
ble for a security incident, identity theft, fraud, harassment, a
malicious or deceptive activity, or any other illegal activity.


(8) If a biometric identifier captured for the purpose of training an
artificial intelligence system is subsequently used for a commercial pur-
pose not described by subsection (7) of this section, the person possessing
the biometric identifier is subject to:
(a) The provisions of this section regarding the possession and de-
struction of a biometric identifier; and
(b) The penalties associated with a violation of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.